Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,163
Interpretation and construction of sections to effectuate uniformity.

Sections 25-21,149 to 25-21,164 shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact them, and to harmonize, as far as possible, with federal laws and regulations on the subject of declaratory judgments and decrees.

Laws 1929, c. 75, § 15, p. 259;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,154;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,163.